Utah statutes.
35A-9-302.   Chair of commission -- Meetings -- Quorum -- Staff support.

(1)  The executive director of the Department of Workforce Services, or the deputy director of the Department of Workforce Services if designated by the executive director, shall serve as chair of the commission.

(2)  The chair:

(a)  is responsible for the call and conduct of meetings;

(b)  shall call and hold meetings of the commission at least quarterly; and

(c)  shall call additional meetings upon request by a majority of the commission's voting members.

(3)  A majority of the voting members of the commission constitutes a quorum of the commission at any meeting and the action of the majority of voting members present is the action of the commission.

(4)  The Department of Workforce Services shall provide staff support to the commission.



Enacted by Chapter 59, 2013 General Session

